dev/apertium-mar.mar.dix
    <pardef n="त/े__prn">
      <e><p><l>े</l><r>े<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्या</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>े<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>े<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>्यांचा</l><r>े<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांची</l><r>े<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 
      <e><p><l>्यांचे</l><r>े<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="त/े__prn_nt">
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>े<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्या</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े</l><r>े<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>े<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>े<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
   
    <pardef n="आपल/ा__prn">
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>ा<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>ा<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 

    <pardef n="तुम्ह/ी__prn_nt">
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ी<s n="prn"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

     <pardef n="कोण__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="impers"/><s n="sp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीतरी</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="impers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाला</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाला</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   
    
    <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->

	<pardef n="अंड__n_nt">
  	  <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>्याला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>्याला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>्यामधून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>्यामधे</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

	  <e><p><l>ी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>्यानमधनं </l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>्यांमधे</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>	
	</pardef>
 
    <pardef n="कुत्र/ा__n_m">

      <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याहून</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यामधे</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ासुद्धा</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/>सुद्धा<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांहून</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांमधे</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांशी</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="मांजर__n_f"> 
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीहून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीमधे</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>  
      <e><p><l>ाबरोबर</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांबरोबर</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ींना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ींना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ींहून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ींमधे</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="घर__n_nt"> 
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ात</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ातून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाबरोबर</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/>बरोबर<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ासमोरच्या</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/>समोर<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ापर्यंत</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/>पर्यंत<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाजवळ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/>जवळ<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाच्या</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांत</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांतून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांबरोबर</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/>बरोबर<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांसमोरच्या</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/>समोर<s n="post"/></r></p></e> 
      <e><p><l>ांपर्यंत</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/>पर्यंत<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांजवळ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/>जवळ<s n="post"/></r></p></e> 
    </pardef>

    <e lm="आपला"><i>आपल</i><par n="आपल/ा__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="काय"><i>काय</i><par n="कोण__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="कोण"><i>कोण</i><par n="कोण__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="तुम्ही"><i>तुम्ह</i><par n="तुम्ह/ी__prn_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ते"><i>त</i><par n="त/े__prn_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यांचा"><i>त्यां</i><par n="त/े__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="हे"><i>ह</i><par n="त/े__prn_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="अस्वल"><i>अस्वल</i><par n="घर__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="उत्तर"><i>उत्तर</i><par n="घर__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="अंगठा"><i>अंगठ</i><par n="कुत्र/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="अंड"><i>अंड</i><par n="अंड__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="कुत्रा"><i>कुत्र</i><par n="कुत्र/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="गळपट्टा"><i>गळपट्ट</i><par n="कुत्र/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="घर"><i>घर</i><par n="घर__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="झाड"><i>झाड</i><par n="घर__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="डाळ"><i>डाळ</i><par n="अंड__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="भात"><i>भात</i><par n="अंड__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="भिंत"><i>भिंत</i><par n="घर__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="मन"><i>मन</i><par n="घर__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="महिना"><i>महिन</i><par n="कुत्र/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="मांजर"><i>मांजर</i><par n="मांजर__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="मुल"><i>मुल</i><par n="घर__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="वातावरण"><i>वातावरण</i><par n="घर__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="सरडा"><i>सरड</i><par n="कुत्र/ा__n_m"/></e>
